Hawaii statutes.
PART
VIII. BALLOTS

§11-111 Official and facsimile ballots.
Ballots issued by the chief election officer in state elections and by the
clerk in county elections are official ballots. In elections using the paper
ballot and electronic voting systems, the chief election officer or clerk in
the case of county elections shall have printed informational posters
containing facsimile ballots which depict the official ballots to be used in
the election. The precinct officials shall post the informational posters
containing the facsimiles of the official ballots near the entrance to the
polling place where they may be easily seen by the voters prior to voting. [L
1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217, §1(ee); am L 1975, c 36, §1(4); am L
1980, c 264, §1(f)]

Cross References

Ballot boxes, see §11-134.

Spoiled ballots, see §11-140.

Case Notes

Constitutional amendment ballot form found defective. 60 H.
324, 590 P.2d 543.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next